src/import/nouns.lexc
ehholaalia+N:ehhol´aalia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehis+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehis SOOLANE ;
ehisaednik+N:ehis#´aedn´ik ÄMBLIK ;
ehitaja+N:ehitaja AASTA ;
ehitamine+N:ehitamine OLULINE ;
ehitatu+N:ehitatu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehitus OLULINE ;
ehitusettevõtja+N:ehitus#´ette#v´õt,ja AASTA ;
ehitusfirma+N:ehitus#firma PERE ;
ehitusjärk+N:ehitus#j´ärk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
ehituskivi+N:ehitus#kivi%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
ehituskonstruktsioon+N:ehitus#konstruktsi´oon TAUD ;
ehituskooperatiiv+N:ehitus#k`ooperat´iiv TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehituskorraldus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehitus#korraldus OLULINE ;
ehituskrunt+N:ehitus#kr´un,t TAUD ;
ehituskunst+N:ehitus#k´un,st TAUD ;
ehituslugu+N:ehitus#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
ehitusmaterjal+N:ehitus#materjal TAUD ;
ehitusmees+N:ehitus#me MEES ;
ehitusmeister+N:ehitus#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
ehitusosakond+N:ehitus#`osak´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
ehitusplats+N:ehitus#pl´at,s TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehitusseadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehitus#s´eadus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehitustegevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehitus#tegevus OLULINE ;
ehitusturg+N:ehitus#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ehitustöö+N:ehitus#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
ehitustööline+N:ehitus#t´ööline SUULINE ;
ehmatamine+N:ehmatamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehmatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ehmatus OLULINE ;
ehmes+N:´ehme KOTKAS ;
ehmumine+N:´ehmumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehmus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´ehmus SUULINE ;
ehteasi+N:´ehte#´as,J1%>%{pl.u%} ASI ;
ehtekaup+N:´ehte#k´aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@ehtsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´ehtsus SUULINE ;
ei-sõna+N:´ei-sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@eideetik+N:@P.NomStem.First@eideetik VIRSIK ;
eideke+N:eideke PEENIKE ;
eideköbi+N:eide#köbi KAVA ;
eiderhani+N:eider#han, NIMI ;
eidetism+N:eidet´ism TAUD ;
eidetudi+N:eide#tud,i KAVA ;
eikellegimaa+N:ei#kellegi#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
eimidagitegemine+N:ei#midagi#tegemine OLULINE ;
eimiski+N:ei#m´iski AASTA ;
eine+N:´eine PINGE ;
einela+N:´einela AASTA ;
einelaud+N:´eine#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
einestamine+N:einestamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@einestus+N:@P.NomStem.First@einestus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@einetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@einetus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@einsats+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eins´at,s TAUD ;
eiraja+N:´eiraja AASTA ;
eiramine+N:´eiramine OLULINE ;
eit+N:´eit%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
eitamine+N:´eitamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eitus SUULINE ;
eitussõna+N:´eitus#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@ejakulatsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@ejakulatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekipaaž+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekip´aaž TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@@P.NomStem.First@ekker+N:@R.Part.One@@P.NomStem.First@´ekkE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eklektik+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekl`ektik VIRSIK ;
eklektika+N:ekl`ektika AASTA ;
eklektitsism+N:eklektits´ism TAUD ;
ekliptika+N:ekl`iptika AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekläär+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekl´äär TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekossees+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekoss´ees TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekraan+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekr´aan TAUD ;
ekraanipilt+N:ekr`aani#p´il,t TAUD ;
ekraaniteos+N:ekr`aani#t´eos SOOLANE ;
eksabikaasa+N:´eks#abi#kaasa PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksaltatsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksaltatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksalteeritus+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksalteeritus OLULINE ;
eksalteerunu+N:eksalt´eerunu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksam+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksam REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksaminaator+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksamin´aator REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksaminand+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksamin´and TAUD ;
eksamineerija+N:eksamin´eerija AASTA ;
eksamineeritav+N:eksamineeritav MAGUS ;
eksamipäev+N:´eksami#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekseem+N:@P.NomStem.First@eks´eem TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksegees+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekseg´ees TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksegeet+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekseg´eet TAUD ;
eksegeetika+N:eksegeetika AASTA ;
eksekuteerija+N:eksekut´eerija AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksekutsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksekutsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksekuutor+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksek´uutor REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksempel+N:@P.NomStem.First@eks´empE2l REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksemplar+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksemplar TAUD ;
ekshibitsionism+N:ekshibitsion´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksiarvamus+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksi#´arvamus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksiil+N:@P.NomStem.First@eks´iil TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksiilvalitsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@eks´iil#valitsus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksimatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksimatus SUULINE ;
eksimine+N:´eksimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksimus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksimus OLULINE ;
eksinu+N:´eksinu AASTA ;
eksirada+N:eksi#raJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
eksisamm+N:eksi#s´amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
eksisteerimine+N:eksist´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksistents+N:@P.NomStem.First@`eksist´ents TAUD ;
eksistentsialism+N:eksistentsial´ism TAUD ;
eksitaja+N:eksitaja AASTA ;
eksitamine+N:eksitamine OLULINE ;
eksitee+N:eksi#t´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksitus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksivus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksivus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekskavaator+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekskav´aator REDEL ;
eksklaav+N:eks#kl´aav TAUD ;
ekskomissar+N:´eks#komissar TAUD ;
ekskommunist+N:´eks#kommun´ist TAUD ;
ekskreet+N:eks#kr´eet TAUD ;
ekskrement+N:eks#krem´en,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekskursant+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekskurs´an,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekskursioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekskursi´oon TAUD ;
ekskursioonijuht+N:ekskursi`ooni#j´uhT1 TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekskurss+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksk´urss TAUD ;
ekslibrist+N:eks#libr´ist TAUD ;
eksliibris+N:eks#liibris SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekslikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksli´kkus OLULINE ;
ekslinnapea+N:´eks#linna#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
eksmaailmameister+N:´eks#m´aa#ilma#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
eksmatrikulatsioon+N:eks#matrikulatsi´oon TAUD ;
eksmeister+N:´eks#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
eksminister+N:´eks#min´istE2r REDEL ;
eksmiss+N:´eks#m´iss TAUD ;
eksoallergeen+N:ekso#`allerg´een TAUD ;
eksootika+N:eksootika AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksootilisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksootilisus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspander+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksp´andE2r REDEL ;
ekspankur+N:´eks#p´ankur REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspansiivsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekspans´iivsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspansioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekspansi´oon TAUD ;
ekspatriatsioon+N:eks#patriatsi´oon TAUD ;
ekspeaminister+N:´eks#p´ea#min´istE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspediitor+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksped´iitor REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspeditsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekspeditsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksperiment+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksperim´en,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksperimentaator+N:@P.NomStem.First@eksperiment´aator REDEL ;
eksperimenteerija+N:eksperiment´eerija AASTA ;
eksperimenteerimine+N:eksperiment´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspert+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksp´ert TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspertarvamus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksp´ert#´arvamus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspertiis+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekspert´iis TAUD ;
ekspertiisiakt+N:ekspert`iisi#´akt TAUD ;
eksplikatsioon+N:eks#plikatsi´oon TAUD ;
eksplosioon+N:eks#plosi´oon TAUD ;
ekspluataator+N:eks#pluat´aator REDEL ;
ekspluatatsioon+N:eks#pluatatsi´oon TAUD ;
ekspluateerija+N:eks#pluat´eerija AASTA ;
ekspolitseinik+N:´eks#polits´ein´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksponaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekspon´aat TAUD ;
eksponeerimine+N:ekspon´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksponent+N:@P.NomStem.First@`ekspon´ent TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksponomeeter+N:@P.NomStem.First@`eksponom´eetE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksport+N:@P.NomStem.First@´eksp´ort TAUD ;
eksportija+N:eksp´ortija AASTA ;
eksportimine+N:eksp´ortimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@eksportöör+N:@P.NomStem.First@`eksport´öör TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspositsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@ekspositsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@ekspress+N:@P.NomStem.First@´ekspr´es,s TAUD ;
ekspressionism+N:eks#pression´ism TAUD ;
ekspressioon+N:eks#pressi´oon TAUD ;
eksprompt+N:eks#pr´ompt TAUD ;
